Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 20 TLSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh S.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 APPROPRIATIONS, DISTRIBUTIONS, TRANSFERS, AND EXPENDITURE 2 AUTHORITY 3 Section 1. LIMITATIONS OF STANDING APPROPRIATIONS ââ FY 4 2026-2027. Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the 5 following designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 6 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from 7 the general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 8 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 9 amount: 10 For payment of claims for nonpublic school pupil 11 transportation under section 285.2 : 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,997,091 13 If total approved claims for reimbursement for nonpublic 14 school pupil transportation exceed the amount appropriated in 15 accordance with this section, the department of education shall 16 prorate the amount of each approved claim. 17 Sec. 2. INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT STATE AID ââ FY 2026-2027. In 18 lieu of the appropriation provided in section 257.20, 19 subsection 2, the appropriation for the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, for paying 21 instructional support state aid under section 257.20 for the 22 fiscal year is zero. 23 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT ââ USE 24 OF FEDERAL INCENTIVE PAYMENTS ââ FY 2025-2026 ââ FY 25 2026-2027. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the department of 27 workforce development may use up to $12,000,000 from incentive 28 payments made to the state pursuant to the federal Assistance 29 for Unemployed Workers and Struggling Families Act, Pub. L. 30 No. 111-5, Div. B, Tit. II, pursuant to a special transfer 31 under section 903 of the federal Social Security Act, for 32 administration of the unemployment compensation insurance 33 program and for unemployment compensation insurance systems 34 modernization. 35 -1- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 1/ 41 S.F. _____ Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES INFORMATION 1 TECHNOLOGY FUND ââ TRANSFERS. On July 1, 2026, all of the 2 following shall be transferred to the information technology 3 fund created in section 217.25: 4 1. The unencumbered and unobligated balance, including all 5 interest and earnings thereon, of the Iowa coronavirus fiscal 6 recovery fund created in section 8.57G. 7 2. The unencumbered and unobligated balance, including all 8 interest and earnings thereon, of moneys available to the state 9 pursuant to the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic 10 Security Act, Pub. L. No. 116-136. 11 Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES INFORMATION 12 TECHNOLOGY FUND ââ APPROPRIATIONS. 13 1. There is appropriated from the information technology 14 fund created in section 217.25 to the department of health and 15 human services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 16 ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof 17 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 18 a. For the Medicaid management information system: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 31,000,000 20 b. For the eligibility determination for essential needs 21 information technology modernization project: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,500,000 23 c. For information technology projects associated with 24 child support services: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,000,000 26 d. (1) For information technology costs associated with 27 implementation of 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 104, and 2026 Iowa 28 Acts, Senate File 2422, if enacted: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 30 (2) The appropriation in this paragraph shall be used 31 to implement 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 104, if 2026 Iowa Acts, 32 Senate File 2422, is not enacted. 33 2. Following the appropriations in subsection 1, the 34 remaining balance of the information technology fund created in 35 -2- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 2/ 41 S.F. _____ section 217.25 is appropriated to the department of health and 1 human services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 2 ending June 30, 2027, to be used for the Medicaid management 3 information system. 4 3. Moneys appropriated in this section shall not be used 5 for maintenance, operations, staffing, or other corporate 6 technology needs of the department. 7 Sec. 6. SPECIAL FUNDS ââ SALARY ADJUSTMENTS ââ FY 8 2026-2027. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 9 ending June 30, 2027, salary adjustments otherwise provided 10 may be funded as determined by the department of management, 11 subject to any applicable constitutional limitation, using 12 unappropriated moneys remaining in the commerce revolving 13 fund, the gaming enforcement revolving fund, the gaming 14 regulatory revolving fund, the primary road fund, the road 15 use tax fund, the fish and game protection fund, and the Iowa 16 public employeesâ retirement fund, and in other departmental 17 revolving, trust, or special funds for which the general 18 assembly has not made an operating budget appropriation. 19 Sec. 7. Section 8.57I, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 20 by adding the following new paragraph: 21 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 22 1, 2026, and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated 23 from the sports wagering receipts fund to the department of 24 health and human services one million dollars to provide a 25 grant to the Iowa healthiest state initiative to support 26 the double up food bucks program to make fresh fruits and 27 vegetables sold at farmers markets, grocery stores, and other 28 participating locations accessible to individuals and families 29 who reside in this state and receive assistance through the 30 federal supplemental nutrition assistance program. 31 (2) A grant recipient that receives funding pursuant to this 32 paragraph shall provide at least a dollar-for-dollar match of 33 the grant assistance. 34 (3) Subsections 5 and 6 do not apply to moneys appropriated 35 -3- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 3/ 41 S.F. _____ under this paragraph. 1 Sec. 8. Section 84F.1, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 2026, 2 is amended to read as follows: 3 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated to the 4 department by the general assembly for purposes of this section 5 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end close of 6 the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall 7 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 8 in subsequent fiscal years by the department to operate and 9 manage the Iowa office of apprenticeship established in section 10 84D.3 or for other apprenticeship activities deemed appropriate 11 by the department, not subject to the limitation set forth in 12 paragraph âaâ . 13 Sec. 9. Section 84F.2, subsection 7, paragraph b, Code 2026, 14 is amended to read as follows: 15 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated to the 16 department by the general assembly for purposes of this section 17 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the end close of 18 the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall 19 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 20 in subsequent fiscal years by the department to operate and 21 manage the Iowa office of apprenticeship established in section 22 84D.3 or for other apprenticeship activities deemed appropriate 23 by the department, not subject to the limitation set forth in 24 paragraph âaâ . 25 Sec. 10. Section 257.35, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 26 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 27 following: 28 2. The amounts specified for school districts in section 29 257.10, subsection 7, for the fiscal year beginning July 30 1, 2026, and each succeeding fiscal year, shall be reduced 31 by the department of management by thirty-two million five 32 hundred thousand dollars. The department of management shall 33 calculate a state aid reduction such that such amounts shall be 34 reduced proportionally to the amount that the district would 35 -4- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 4/ 41 S.F. _____ otherwise have received under section 257.10, subsection 7. 1 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and each fiscal 2 year thereafter, from the reduction under this subsection for 3 that fiscal year there is appropriated ten million dollars to 4 the department of education for division of special education 5 general supervision, oversight, compliance, employee salaries, 6 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes within the 7 area education agency regions and the department of education 8 main office. 9 Sec. 11. Section 257.35, subsections 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, and 20, Code 2026, are 11 amended by striking the subsections. 12 Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 13 immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment: 14 The section of this division of this Act providing for 15 the use of federal incentive payments by the department of 16 workforce development. 17 DIVISION II 18 CORRECTIVE PROVISIONS 19 Sec. 13. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph a, 20 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), if 21 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 14, are 22 amended to read as follows: 23 (a) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 24 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 25 (b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 26 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 27 thousand dollars. 28 Sec. 14. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph c, 29 subparagraphs (1) and (2), if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House 30 File 2635, section 14, are amended to read as follows: 31 (1) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 32 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 33 (2) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 34 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 35 -5- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 5/ 41 S.F. _____ thousand dollars. 1 Sec. 15. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph e, 2 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), if 3 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 14, are 4 amended to read as follows: 5 (a) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 6 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 7 (b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 8 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 9 thousand dollars. 10 Sec. 16. Section 135.61, subsection 16, paragraph f, 11 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (a) and (b), if 12 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 14, are 13 amended to read as follows: 14 (a) Beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and before 15 December 31, 2031, January 1, 2032, four million dollars. 16 (b) Beginning on or after January 1, 2032, and before 17 December 31, 2036, January 1, 2037, four million five hundred 18 thousand dollars. 19 Sec. 17. Section 135C.6, subsection 1, paragraph b, as 20 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 572, section 2, is 21 amended to read as follows: 22 b. A supported community living service, as defined in 23 section 225C.21 249A.38B , is not required to be licensed under 24 this chapter , but is subject to approval under section 225C.21 25 249A.38B in order to receive public funding. 26 Sec. 18. Section 135S.1, subsection 2, if enacted by 2026 27 Iowa Acts, House File 571, section 2, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 2. âDiscriminationâ means an adverse action, including but 30 not limited to any penalty, disciplinary, or retaliatory action 31 taken against, or a threat of adverse action communicated 32 to, a medical practitioner or health care institution as a 33 result of the refusal of the medical practitioner or health 34 care institution to participate in a health care service 35 -6- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 6/ 41 S.F. _____ on the basis of conscience. â Discriminationâ not does not 1 include the negotiation or purchase of insurance or a health 2 care service by a nongovernmental entity or individual, the 3 refusal to use or purchase insurance or a health care service 4 by a nongovernmental entity or individual, or a health care 5 institutionâs good-faith effort to accommodate a medical 6 practitionerâs or health care institutionâs exercise of 7 conscience. 8 Sec. 19. Section 135S.2, subsection 1, paragraph a, if 9 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 571, section 3, is 10 amended to read as follows: 11 a. A medical practitioner or health care institution has 12 the right not to participate in or pay for a health care 13 service that violates the medical practitionerâs or health 14 care institutionâs conscience. A medical practitioner shall 15 inform the medical practitionerâs employer of the nature 16 of the medicalâs medical practitionerâs objection based on 17 the practitionerâs conscience. This paragraph shall not be 18 construed to waive or modify a duty a medical practitioner or 19 health care institution may have to participate in a health 20 care service that does not violate the medical practitionerâs 21 conscience. 22 Sec. 20. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2562, section 10, if 23 enacted, is amended by striking the section and inserting in 24 lieu thereof the following: 25 SEC. 10. Section 144H.1, subsection 6, as enacted in section 26 1 of this Act, is amended by striking the subsection and 27 inserting in lieu thereof the following: 28 6. âPerson authorized to consentâ means an individual, 29 in the same order of priority prescribed in section 144A.7, 30 subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , who shall be guided by the express 31 or implied intentions of the patient and who is reasonably 32 available, willing, and competent to consent, refuse to 33 consent, or withdraw consent on a patientâs behalf. 34 Sec. 21. Section 148.11A, subsection 2, paragraph b, as 35 -7- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 7/ 41 S.F. _____ enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2184, section 3, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 b. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 3 set the term of an administrative medicine license, but shall 4 not require an administrative medicine license to be renewed 5 more often than once every three years. An administrative 6 medicine license shall expire on the licenseeâs birthday. 7 Sec. 22. Section 256C.4, subsection 1A, paragraph b, if 8 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2754, section 87, is 9 amended to read as follows: 10 b. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , 11 and each succeeding fiscal year, of the amount of state 12 preschool funding received by a community-based provider 13 approved to directly participate in the preschool program for 14 a fiscal year, not more than five percent may be used by the 15 community-based provider for administering the approved local 16 program. Outreach activities and rent for facilities not owned 17 by the community-based provider are permissive uses of the 18 administrative funds. 19 Sec. 23. Section 280.37, subsection 3, if enacted by 2026 20 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2086, section 4, is amended to read as 21 follows: 22 3. If the board of directors of a school district or the 23 authorities in charge of an accredited nonpublic school offer 24 the elective junior fire fighter program, then the board of 25 directors of the school district or the authorities in charge 26 of the accredited nonpublic school shall coordinate with a 27 local fire department to ensure students are provided with the 28 appropriate materials and training to successfully complete 29 all components necessary for fire fighter firefighter I 30 certification, including the written certification examination 31 and the practical certification examination. 32 Sec. 24. Section 280.37, subsection 4, paragraph a, if 33 enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2086, section 4, is 34 amended to read as follows: 35 -8- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 8/ 41 S.F. _____ a. Be designed to prepare students to sit for certification 1 testing from the fire service training bureau for fire fighter 2 firefighter I certification. 3 Sec. 25. Section 307.22A, subsection 6, if enacted by 2026 4 Iowa Acts, House File 2667, section 2, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 6. The statewide urban design and specifications board 7 shall publish on the Iowa state university of science and 8 technologyâs internet site an analysis of any changes made 9 to the statewide urban design and specifications manuals and 10 provide an estimate of expected cost variations that are likely 11 to be incurred, if any, by implementing the changes. 12 Sec. 26. Section 452A.33, subsection 1, paragraph c, 13 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, as amended by 2026 Iowa Acts, 14 House File 2643, section 5, is amended to read as follows: 15 (2) (a) If a retail dealer fails to file a timely filed 16 report as required by this subsection or fails to maintain 17 records required to file the report , the department may impose 18 a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars per 19 occurrence in addition to any other penalty provided by law. 20 The penalty amount shall be deposited into the general fund of 21 the state. 22 (b) A retail dealer who fails to timely file a timely 23 filed report as required by this subsection for the latest 24 determination period ending on or before the last day of the 25 retail dealerâs tax year is also ineligible to claim any tax 26 credit available under section 422.11O, 422.11P, or 422.11Y for 27 the tax year. 28 Sec. 27. Section 514F.8D, subsection 5, if enacted by 2026 29 Iowa Acts, House File 2635, section 4, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 5. The commissioner of insurance may adopt rules pursuant to 32 chapter 17A to administer and enforce this section. 33 Sec. 28. Section 537C.9, as enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House 34 File 2497, section 9, is amended to read as follows: 35 -9- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 9/ 41 S.F. _____ 537C.9 Program agreement ââ approved parties. 1 1. A program shall only enter into a program agreement with 2 the following persons: 3 1. a. A resident of this state who holds a driverâs license 4 issued in this state that authorizes the person to operate a 5 vehicle of the class of the shared vehicle that is the subject 6 of the program agreement. 7 2. b. A nonresident of this state who holds a driverâs 8 license issued by the state or country of the personâs 9 residence that authorizes the person to operate a vehicle of 10 the class of the shared vehicle that is the subject of the 11 program agreement, and is at least the minimum age required by 12 this state to operate a vehicle of that class. 13 3. c. A person who is specifically authorized by this state 14 to operate a vehicle of the class of the shared vehicle that is 15 the subject of the program agreement. 16 4. 2. A program shall keep permanent records of all of the 17 following: 18 a. The names and address of each shared vehicle driver. 19 b. The driverâs license number and place of issuance of each 20 shared vehicle driver, and any other person who may operate a 21 shared vehicle under a program agreement. 22 Sec. 29. Section 910.2, subsection 3, as enacted by 2026 23 Iowa Acts, House File 2697, section 1, is amended to read as 24 follows: 25 3. Notwithstanding any other statute or rule of law, with 26 the consent of the defendant and the prosecuting attorney, the 27 court may order as part of the dismissal of a public offense 28 or violation of an ordinance that the defendant pay pecuniary 29 damages to the victim , and category âBâ restitution, which 30 shall include court costs. 31 Sec. 30. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2739, section 13, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 SEC. 13. TEMPORARY PROVISIONS FOR THE HEALTH CARE-RELATED 34 TAX AND PREPAYMENTS FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2026. Notwithstanding 35 -10- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 10/ 41 S.F. _____ section 432B.2, subsection 1, if enacted by this division 1 of this Act, each health care maintenance organization 2 transacting business in this state shall be subject to a health 3 care-related tax payable to the director of revenue in an 4 amount equal to three and one-half percent of the applicable 5 percentage of taxable funds as defined in section 432B.1, 6 if enacted by this division of this Act, for the period in 7 calendar year beginning January 1, 2026, and ending September 8 30, 2026. The difference between the amount of taxes collected 9 pursuant to this section and the amount of tax that would be 10 collected by imposing the rate under section 432B.2, subsection 11 1, if enacted by this division of this Act, shall not be 12 subject to prepayment under section 432B.3, subsection 1 2 , if 13 enacted by this division of this Act. 14 Sec. 31. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2757, sections 5 and 6, 15 if enacted, are amended to read as follows: 16 SEC. 5. APPLICABILITY. Except as otherwise provided, this 17 Act applies to tangible personal property or specified digital 18 projects products sold to or of services furnished to a nuclear 19 electric generation facility when permissible under section 20 423.3, subsection 111, paragraph âcâ, if enacted by this Act. 21 SEC. 6. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 22 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tangible personal 23 property or specified digital projects products sold to or of 24 services furnished to a nuclear electric generation facility 25 that is undertaking an activity described in section 423.3, 26 subsection 111, paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), subparagraph 27 subdivision (i), if enacted by this Act. 28 Sec. 32. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 29 immediate importance, take effect upon enactment: 30 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 31 256C.4, subsection 1A, paragraph âbâ. 32 2. The section of this division of this Act amending 2026 33 Iowa Acts, House File 2739, section 13. 34 Sec. 33. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 35 -11- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 11/ 41 S.F. _____ retroactively to the effective date of 2026 Iowa Acts, House 1 File 2754, if enacted: 2 The section of this division of this Act amending section 3 256C.4, subsection 1A, paragraph âbâ. 4 Sec. 34. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. The following applies 5 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 6 or after that date: 7 The section of this division of this Act amending 2026 Iowa 8 Acts, House File 2739, section 13. 9 DIVISION III 10 NATIONAL ELECTRICAL CODE 11 Sec. 35. Section 103.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 12A. âNational electrical codeâ means 14 the national electrical code, 2023 edition, published by the 15 national fire protection association, as modified by section 16 103.1B, and excluding sections 210.52(C)(3), 230.67, and 17 406.4(D)(4) of the national electrical code, 2023 edition. 18 Sec. 36. NEW SECTION . 103.1B National electrical code ââ 19 alterations. 20 For purposes of the national electrical code: 21 1. Dwelling units. Section 210.8(A) of the national 22 electrical code, 2023 edition, is amended by requiring that 23 one hundred twenty-five volt through two hundred fifty volt 24 receptacles supplied by single-phase branch circuits rated one 25 hundred fifty volts or less to ground installed in a kitchen 26 only require ground-fault circuit interrupter protection 27 for personnel where receptacles are installed to serve the 28 countertop surfaces and by striking section 210.8(A)(7) of the 29 national electrical code, 2023 edition. In lieu of basements, 30 section 210.8(A) of the national electrical code, 2023 edition, 31 shall apply to unfinished portions or areas of the basement not 32 intended as habitable rooms. 33 2. Arc-fault circuit interrupters. Notwithstanding section 34 210.12(B) of the national electrical code, 2023 edition, 35 -12- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 12/ 41 S.F. _____ arc-fault circuit interrupters shall not be required for 1 one-family and two-family dwellings and townhouses, and section 2 210.12(B) of the national electrical code, 2023 edition, shall 3 not apply to kitchens or laundry areas. 4 3. Kitchen receptacles on islands and peninsulas. In lieu 5 of the requirements of section 210.52(C)(2) of the national 6 electrical code, 2023 edition, an electrical provision or 7 at least one receptacle shall be installed at each island 8 and peninsular countertop space with a long dimension of six 9 hundred millimeters, or twenty-four inches, or greater and a 10 short dimension of three hundred millimeters, or twelve inches, 11 or greater, with a peninsular countertop being measured from 12 the connected perpendicular wall. 13 4. Load calculations. With respect to section 220.5(C) 14 of the national electrical code, 2023 edition, the calculated 15 floor area of a dwelling unit shall additionally exclude 16 garages. 17 5. Ceiling outlets. In addition to the requirements of 18 section 314.27(A)(2) of the national electrical code, 2023 19 edition, outlet boxes mounted in the ceilings of family 20 rooms, living rooms, parlors, libraries, dens, bedrooms, 21 sunrooms, recreation rooms, and similar areas of dwelling 22 occupancies, and located in an area of the ceiling typical 23 for the installation of a ceiling-suspended paddle fan shall 24 be installed to accommodate a ceiling-suspended paddle fan in 25 accordance with section 314.27(C) of the national electrical 26 code, 2023 edition. 27 6. Boxes at ceiling-suspended paddle fan outlets. In lieu 28 of the second paragraph of section 314.27(C) of the national 29 electrical code, 2023 edition, where a ceiling-suspended paddle 30 fan is not installed, the outlet box shall comply with either 31 section 314.27(C)(1) or 314.27(C)(2) of the national electrical 32 code, 2023 edition. 33 7. Receptacles near bathtub and shower spaces. In lieu of 34 the requirements of and exceptions to section 406.9(C) of the 35 -13- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 13/ 41 S.F. _____ national electrical code, 2023 edition, receptacles shall not 1 be installed within or directly over a bathtub or shower stall. 2 8. Ground-fault circuit interrupters. Ground-fault circuit 3 interrupter protection is not required for receptacles that 4 serve sump pumps or refrigerators. 5 Sec. 37. NEW SECTION . 103.1C Electrical code ââ amendments 6 ââ limitations. 7 1. A political subdivision shall not adopt a local 8 electrical code that is more restrictive than the national 9 electrical code. 10 2. Prior to adopting any changes to the national electrical 11 code pursuant to section 103.6, including but not limited to by 12 adopting the national electrical code, 2026 edition, published 13 by the national fire protection association, the board shall 14 conduct an analysis of the cost to consumers of any significant 15 changes to the national electrical code. The analysis shall 16 be submitted to the administrative rules coordinator and 17 the administrative code editor for publication in the Iowa 18 administrative bulletin along with the notice of intended 19 action. 20 Sec. 38. FUTURE REPEAL. Section 103.1, subsection 12A, and 21 section 103.1B, as enacted by this division of this Act, are 22 repealed effective upon the adoption of the national electrical 23 code, 2026 edition, published by the national fire protection 24 association, by the electrical examining board. The electrical 25 examining board shall inform the Iowa Code editor upon the 26 adoption of the national electrical code, 2026 edition. 27 Sec. 39. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 28 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 29 DIVISION IV 30 LOCAL LAWS ââ CIVIL RIGHTS 31 Sec. 40. Section 216.19, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 32 1, Code 2026, as amended by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 579, 33 section 1, is amended to read as follows: 34 All cities shall, to the extent possible, protect the rights 35 -14- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 14/ 41 S.F. _____ of the citizens of this state secured by the Iowa civil rights 1 Act. A city or local government shall not enact or enforce 2 any ordinance or other law which is broader or has different 3 categories of unfair or discriminatory practices than those 4 provided in this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be 5 construed as indicating any of the following: 6 DIVISION V 7 POLITICAL PARTY STATE CENTRAL COMMITTEES 8 Sec. 41. Section 43.111, subsections 1 and 3, Code 2026, are 9 amended to read as follows: 10 1. a. The state convention held by each political party 11 pursuant to section 43.107 shall adopt a state platform, adopt 12 or amend a state party constitution, and bylaws if desired, and 13 transact other business which may properly be brought before 14 it. A copy of the constitution and any bylaws so adopted 15 or amended shall be kept on file in the office of the state 16 commissioner. 17 b. A state party constitution or bylaws shall not prohibit 18 an elected official from serving on a state party central 19 committee. 20 3. a. The state central committee so selected may organize 21 at pleasure for political work as is usual and customary with 22 such committees, adopt bylaws, provide for the governing 23 of party auxiliary bodies, and shall continue to act until 24 succeeded by another central committee selected as required by 25 this section . The receipts and disbursements of each political 26 partyâs state party central committee shall be audited annually 27 by a certified public accountant selected by the state party 28 central committee and the audit report shall be filed with the 29 state commissioner. 30 b. Each political partyâs state central committee shall 31 elect a chairperson, co-chairperson or vice chairperson, 32 treasurer, and secretary. 33 DIVISION VI 34 NOXIOUS WEEDS 35 -15- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 15/ 41 S.F. _____ Sec. 42. Section 317.1A, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (13) Japanese knotweed (Fallopia 3 japonica). 4 DIVISION VII 5 IOWA STATE FAIR FOUNDATION ââ NONRESIDENT DEER HUNTING LICENSE 6 Sec. 43. Section 483A.24, subsection 3, unnumbered 7 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 The director shall provide up to one hundred twenty-five 9 twenty-six nonresident deer hunting licenses for allocation as 10 provided in this subsection . 11 Sec. 44. Section 483A.24, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 12 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. One nonresident deer hunting license 14 shall be allocated as determined by the Iowa state fair 15 foundation established pursuant to section 173.22. 16 DIVISION VIII 17 PROPRIETARY TREATMENT SYSTEMS 18 Sec. 45. NEW SECTION . 455B.241 Definitions. 19 As used in this part 3 of subchapter III, unless the context 20 otherwise requires: 21 1. âCertified technicianâ means a person who is certified 22 in accordance with the manufacturer to monitor, maintain, and 23 inspect a proprietary treatment system. 24 2. âProprietary treatment systemâ means a system that 25 is certified by an ANSI-accredited third-party certifier, 26 including certification meeting standard NSF/ANSI40 for 27 effluent from class I systems. 28 Sec. 46. NEW SECTION . 455B.242 Monitoring and maintenance 29 requirements. 30 1. A proprietary treatment system shall be inspected, 31 monitored, and maintained by the certified technician in 32 accordance with the manufacturerâs specifications. 33 2. All maintenance and visual inspections of a proprietary 34 treatment system shall be performed by a certified technician. 35 -16- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 16/ 41 S.F. _____ A manufacturer-certified technician shall report results, 1 as provided in section 455B.243, to the system owner and to 2 the applicable administrative authority within thirty days 3 following the inspection. The certified technician shall also 4 report any discontinuance or proprietary treatment system 5 maintenance to the applicable administrative authority. If 6 the applicable administrative authority is not the department, 7 the administrative authority must also submit the information 8 to the department in the form and manner prescribed by the 9 department. 10 Sec. 47. NEW SECTION . 455B.243 Reporting. 11 1. A maintenance and visual inspection report for a 12 proprietary treatment system, as required under section 13 455B.242, that was installed on or after January 1, 2018, shall 14 record at least all of the following information: 15 a. The date of the inspection. 16 b. The manufacturer and model of the proprietary treatment 17 system. 18 c. Any sign of equipment malfunction, the cause or potential 19 cause of the malfunction, and any corrective action taken. 20 d. Results of effluent testing if the proprietary treatment 21 system is subject to national pollution discharge elimination 22 system general permit number four for private sewage disposal 23 systems. 24 e. If the proprietary treatment system appears to be 25 functioning incorrectly, the primary cause or causes for the 26 deficiency, including but not limited to any of the following: 27 (1) Improper design. 28 (2) Improper installation. 29 (3) Lack of required maintenance. 30 (4) Improper operation or malfunction. 31 (5) Other damages or conditions contributing to the 32 malfunction that require a repair or replacement. 33 f. Whether the proprietary treatment system required repair 34 outside of scheduled maintenance intervals, including the 35 -17- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 17/ 41 S.F. _____ reason for the repair and whether the system was in a failed 1 state at the time of repair. 2 g. Any action taken to bring the proprietary treatment 3 system back into operation as designed. 4 h. Maintenance records as required by the manufacturerâs 5 warranty for the proprietary treatment system. 6 2. The completed report shall be submitted to the department 7 by the certified technician in the form and manner prescribed 8 by the department. 9 3. The department shall compile the information submitted 10 pursuant to this section and shall maintain a publicly 11 accessible database summarizing inspection outcomes and 12 unscheduled failures or repairs. The information in the 13 database shall include the name of the proprietary treatment 14 system, product name, and model design. The database shall not 15 include personally identifiable information. 16 4. The department shall not assess any fees associated 17 with the receipt or collection of reports required under this 18 section. 19 Sec. 48. NEW SECTION . 455B.244 Rulemaking authority. 20 The department may adopt rules as necessary to administer 21 this part. 22 Sec. 49. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES ââ PROPRIETARY 23 TREATMENT SYSTEM REVIEW AND REPORT. 24 1. The department of natural resources shall review the 25 information regarding proprietary treatment systems, as defined 26 in section 455B.241, as enacted by this division of this Act, 27 reported to the department pursuant to section 455B.243, as 28 enacted by this division of this Act. 29 2. The department shall review the information submitted 30 in annual inspection and maintenance reports, including 31 proprietary treatment system functionality, causes of 32 deficiencies, and maintenance practices. The department shall 33 also review any other data the department determines relevant 34 to evaluating system performance. 35 -18- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 18/ 41 S.F. _____ 3. The review shall include analysis of inspection, 1 monitoring, and maintenance data collected from July 1, 2 2026, to December 1, 2028, for purposes of evaluating the 3 performance, reliability, maintenance needs, and common causes 4 of malfunction of proprietary treatment systems. 5 4. The department shall submit to the general assembly on or 6 before January 10, 2029, a report detailing the departmentâs 7 findings and recommendations. 8 Sec. 50. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 9 to the inspection, monitoring, and maintenance of proprietary 10 treatment systems, as defined in section 455B.241, as enacted 11 by this division of this Act, performed on or after July 1, 12 2026. 13 DIVISION IX 14 POULTRY ASSOCIATION 15 Sec. 51. Section 163.3C, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 16 2026, is amended to read as follows: 17 f. The Iowa north central poultry association or its 18 successor organization . 19 Sec. 52. Section 165B.5, subsection 2, paragraph e, Code 20 2026, is amended to read as follows: 21 e. An event sponsored or sanctioned by the Iowa turkey 22 marketing council, the Iowa turkey federation, the national 23 turkey federation, the Iowa north central poultry association 24 or its successor organization , the Iowa egg council, the 25 American egg board, or the American poultry association. 26 Sec. 53. Section 184.2, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 4. Immediately after passage of the question at the 29 referendum, the secretary shall appoint seven members to the 30 council in accordance with section 184.6 based on nominations 31 made by the Iowa north central poultry association or its 32 successor organization . The association shall nominate and 33 the secretary shall appoint two members representing large 34 producers, two members representing medium producers, and 35 -19- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 19/ 41 S.F. _____ three members representing small producers. The department, 1 in consultation with the association, shall determine initial 2 classifications for small, medium, and large producers. The 3 secretary shall complete the appointments within thirty days 4 following passage of the question at the referendum. 5 Sec. 54. Section 267.2, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 6 2026, is amended to read as follows: 7 d. One poultry producer appointed by the north central 8 poultry association , or its successor organization, who shall 9 serve an initial term of two years. 10 DIVISION X 11 HEALTH CARE ACCESS AND INNOVATION TAX CREDIT 12 Sec. 55. NEW SECTION . 432.12P Health care access and 13 innovation tax credit. 14 1. As used in this section: 15 a. âDepartmentâ means the department of revenue. 16 b. âDomestic insurerâ means the same as defined in section 17 521A.1. 18 c. âEligible taxpayerâ means a domestic insurer that files 19 an annual statement pursuant to section 508.11, completes 20 the national association of insurance commissionerâs health 21 statement test, and has policies in force issued pursuant to 22 chapter 513B. 23 d. âExpendituresâ includes programs, payments, or grants. 24 e. âHealth care access and innovationâ means expenditures 25 that support one or more of the following: 26 (1) Improving access to health care services in rural areas 27 in this state. 28 (2) Value-based payments to a health care provider that 29 provides additional compensation to the health care provider 30 based on evidence-based metrics of the health care providerâs 31 patient care or outcomes. 32 (3) Increasing the interoperability or transparency of 33 health care information to benefit health care consumers and 34 health care providers. 35 -20- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 20/ 41 S.F. _____ 2. The tax imposed under this chapter shall be reduced by a 1 health care access and innovation tax credit authorized in this 2 section for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, 3 but before January 1, 2034. 4 3. The amount of the health care access and innovation tax 5 credit shall equal twenty-five percent of the expenditures that 6 support health care access and innovation made by an eligible 7 taxpayer. 8 4. In order to claim the tax credit for a tax year, 9 an eligible taxpayer shall apply to the department in a 10 manner approved by the department, and shall provide any 11 other information related to the tax credit requested. The 12 cumulative value of tax credits claimed in each tax year by 13 applicants shall not exceed three million dollars. 14 5. The department, in consultation with the department of 15 insurance and financial services, may adopt rules pursuant to 16 chapter 17A to administer this section. 17 Sec. 56. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 18 Act applies retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years 19 beginning on or after that date. 20 DIVISION XI 21 ALTERNATIVE NICOTINE AND VAPOR PRODUCTS ââ PEDIATRIC CANCER 22 RESEARCH 23 Sec. 57. Section 453A.35A, subsection 1, paragraph b, 24 subparagraph (1), if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 25 2480, section 3, is amended to read as follows: 26 (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and each 27 fiscal year thereafter, the first three million dollars 28 from the amount of tax collected that is attributable to the 29 additional taxes on alternative nicotine products and vapor 30 products pursuant to section 453A.43A is appropriated from the 31 health care trust fund to the state board of regents for the 32 purpose of conducting pediatric cancer research , and clinical 33 therapy access , and providing physician-scientist leadership at 34 the state university of Iowa stead family childrenâs hospital. 35 -21- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 21/ 41 S.F. _____ Moneys appropriated in this subparagraph shall not be used for 1 administrative or overhead costs, or activities not directly 2 related to the purposes designated in this subparagraph. 3 Sec. 58. Section 453A.45, subsection 5, paragraph c, 4 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, as amended by 2026 Iowa 5 Acts, Senate File 2480, section 8, if enacted, is amended to 6 read as follows: 7 c. Common carriers knowingly transporting tobacco products, 8 alternative nicotine products, or vapor products into this 9 state shall file with the director reports of all such 10 shipments other than those which are delivered to public 11 warehouses of first destination in this state which are 12 licensed under the provisions of chapter 554 . Such reports 13 shall be filed electronically with the department on or before 14 the tenth day of each month and shall show with respect to 15 deliveries made in the preceding month all of the following: 16 Sec. 59. SPORTS WAGERING RECEIPTS FUND ââ PEDIATRIC CANCER 17 RESEARCH ââ FY 2026-2027. 18 1. There is appropriated from the sports wagering receipts 19 fund created in section 8.57I to the state board of regents for 20 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 21 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 22 to be used for the purposes designated: 23 For pediatric cancer research including but not limited to 24 laboratory research and clinical trials at the university of 25 Iowa hospitals and clinics, and for providing therapy access at 26 the state university of Iowa stead family childrenâs hospital: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 28 2. Moneys appropriated in this section shall not be used for 29 administrative or overhead costs, or activities not directly 30 related to the purposes designated in this section. 31 3. The state board of regents shall submit a report to the 32 governor and the general assembly by October 1, 2027, detailing 33 how the appropriated moneys were used. 34 4. Section 8.57I, subsections 5 and 6, do not apply to 35 -22- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 22/ 41 S.F. _____ moneys appropriated in this section. 1 Sec. 60. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take 2 effect January 1, 2027, if 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2480, 3 is enacted: 4 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 5 453A.35A. 6 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 7 453A.45. 8 Sec. 61. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes 9 effect July 1, 2026, if 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2480, is 10 enacted: 11 The section of this division of this Act appropriating 12 moneys from the sports wagering receipts fund. 13 DIVISION XII 14 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE PROGRAMS 15 Sec. 62. 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2422, if enacted, is 16 amended by adding the following new section: 17 NEW SECTION . SEC. 2A. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. This 18 division of this Act takes effect on the date the department of 19 health and human services implements the supplemental nutrition 20 assistance program and cash assistance eligibility system known 21 as the eligibility determination for essential needs system. 22 The department of health and human services shall notify the 23 Iowa Code editor of the date of implementation on or before 24 that date. 25 Sec. 63. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 26 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 27 DIVISION XIII 28 JUDICIAL BRANCH AND COUNTY ATTORNEY SALARIES 29 Sec. 64. Section 331.752, subsection 5, Code 2026, is 30 amended to read as follows: 31 5. The resolution changing the status of a county attorney 32 shall state the initial annual salary to be paid to the county 33 attorney when the full-time or part-time status is effective. 34 The annual salary specified in the resolution shall remain 35 -23- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 23/ 41 S.F. _____ effective until changed as provided in section 331.907 . Except 1 in counties having a population of more than two hundred 2 thousand, the annual salary of a full-time county attorney 3 shall be an amount which is between forty-five percent and one 4 hundred percent of the annual salary received by a district 5 court judge. 6 Sec. 65. Section 602.1401, subsections 1 and 5, Code 2026, 7 are amended to read as follows: 8 1. The supreme court shall establish, and may amend, a 9 personnel system and a pay and benefits plan for judicial 10 officers, the state court administrator, and court employees. 11 The personnel system shall include a designation by position 12 title, classification, and function of each position or class 13 of positions within the judicial branch. Reasonable efforts 14 shall be made to accommodate the individual staffing and 15 management practices of the respective clerks of the district 16 court. The personnel system, in the employment of court 17 employees, shall not discriminate on the basis of race, creed, 18 color, sex, national origin, religion, physical disability, or 19 political party preference. The supreme court, in establishing 20 the personnel system, shall implement the comparable worth 21 directives issued by the state court administrator under 22 section 602.1204, subsection 2 . The personnel system 23 shall include the prohibitions against sexual harassment of 24 full-time, part-time, and temporary employees set out in 25 section 19B.12 , and shall include a grievance procedure for 26 discriminatory harassment. The personnel system shall develop 27 and distribute at the time of hiring or orientation, a guide 28 that describes for employees the applicable sexual harassment 29 prohibitions and grievance, violation, and disposition 30 procedures. This subsection does not supersede the remedies 31 provided under chapter 216 . 32 5. The pay and benefits plan shall set the compensation and 33 benefits of judicial officers, the state court administrator, 34 and court employees within the funds appropriated by the 35 -24- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 24/ 41 S.F. _____ general assembly. 1 Sec. 66. Section 602.1502, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 2 amended by striking the subsection. 3 Sec. 67. Section 602.6808, subsection 1, if enacted by 2026 4 Iowa Acts, Senate File 639, section 8, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 1. A judge of the business court shall receive the annual 7 salary set for a district judge under section 602.1501 8 602.1401 . 9 Sec. 68. Section 602.9104, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 10 2026, is amended to read as follows: 11 a. A judge to whom this article applies shall be paid an 12 amount equal to the basic salary of the judge as set by the 13 general assembly pursuant to section 602.1401 reduced by an 14 amount designated as the judgeâs required contribution to the 15 judicial retirement fund. The amount designated as the judgeâs 16 required contribution shall be paid by the state in the manner 17 provided in subsection 2 . 18 Sec. 69. Section 602.9204, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. A judge who retires on or after July 1, 1994, and who 21 is appointed a senior judge under section 602.9203 shall be 22 paid a salary as determined by the general assembly pursuant to 23 section 602.1401 . 24 Sec. 70. Section 602.9303, subsection 1, as enacted by 2026 25 Iowa Acts, House File 2706, section 30, is amended to read as 26 follows: 27 1. A magistrate who retires on or after the effective date 28 of this division of this Act, and who is appointed a senior 29 magistrate under section 602.9302, shall be paid a salary 30 as determined by the general assembly pursuant to section 31 602.1401 . 32 Sec. 71. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2769, section 4, if 33 enacted, is amended to read as follows: 34 SEC. 4. JUDICIAL OFFICER ââ UNPAID LEAVE. Notwithstanding 35 -25- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 25/ 41 S.F. _____ the annual salary rates for judicial officers established by 1 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 158, section 6, pursuant to section 2 602.1401 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 3 ending June 30, 2027, the supreme court may by order place all 4 judicial officers on unpaid leave status on any day employees 5 of the judicial branch are placed on temporary layoff status. 6 The biweekly pay of the judicial officers shall be reduced 7 accordingly for the pay period in which the unpaid leave date 8 occurred in the same manner as for noncontract employees of the 9 judicial branch. Through the course of the fiscal year, the 10 judicial branch may use an amount equal to the aggregate amount 11 of salary reductions due to the judicial officer unpaid leave 12 days for any purpose other than for judicial salaries. 13 Sec. 72. REPEAL. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2706, sections 14 35, 36, and 37, are repealed. 15 Sec. 73. REPEAL. Section 602.1501, Code 2026, is repealed. 16 Sec. 74. JUDICIAL OFFICERS ââ CURRENT SALARY RATES 17 SUPERSEDED. For purposes of 2025 Iowa Acts, chapter 158, 18 section 6, subsection 1, this division of this Act shall be 19 deemed as the provision of salary rates for judicial officers 20 by the general assembly for fiscal years subsequent to the 21 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. 22 Sec. 75. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act takes 23 effect June 19, 2026. 24 DIVISION XIV 25 CIVIL LITIGATION ABUSE 26 Sec. 76. NEW SECTION . 611.24 Civil litigation abuse ââ 27 cause of action. 28 1. As used in this section: 29 a. âCivil legal processâ means a procedure used in a civil 30 action, including but not limited to filing a petition, issuing 31 a subpoena, noticing a deposition, or seeking an injunction, 32 attachment, or similar relief. 33 b. âPrivate partyâ means an individual, corporation, 34 partnership, or other legal entity that is not acting on behalf 35 -26- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 26/ 41 S.F. _____ of a governmental body. 1 c. âUlterior purposeâ means using a civil legal process 2 mainly to obtain a result the civil legal process was not 3 intended to achieve, including but not limited to coercing 4 action on an unrelated matter, interfering with employment 5 or business relationships, or causing financial harm through 6 harassment. 7 2. a. This section applies to the use of civil legal 8 processes by a private party against another private party. 9 b. This section abrogates the common law cause of action for 10 abuse of process for actions between private parties. 11 c. This section does not apply to criminal proceedings or 12 to actions involving the state, a political subdivision, or an 13 officer or employee of the state or a political subdivision 14 acting in an official capacity. 15 3. A private party may bring a civil action for civil 16 litigation abuse against another private party who initiated or 17 caused to be initiated a civil legal process for an ulterior 18 purpose. 19 4. To prevail in a civil action brought under this section, 20 the plaintiff must prove all of the following: 21 a. The defendant used a civil legal process against the 22 plaintiff. 23 b. The civil legal process was used primarily for an 24 ulterior purpose. 25 c. The defendant engaged in a specific, willful act in use 26 of the civil legal process that was not proper in the regular 27 course of the proceeding. 28 d. The underlying civil action or proceeding was resolved in 29 favor of the plaintiff bringing the claim under this section. 30 5. A private party may bring a civil action under this 31 section without showing a special or extraordinary injury. 32 Attorney fees and costs incurred in responding to the misuse of 33 the civil legal process are sufficient to establish injury. 34 6. A private party found liable under this section is liable 35 -27- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 27/ 41 S.F. _____ for actual damages, as defined in section 714H.2, including 1 reasonable attorney fees and costs. 2 Sec. 77. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 3 to civil actions or proceedings that are resolved on or after 4 the effective date of this division of this Act. 5 DIVISION XV 6 HUMAN TRAFFICKING 7 Sec. 78. Section 232.71B, subsection 1, paragraph a, 8 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 If the department determines a report constitutes a child 11 abuse allegation, the department shall promptly commence either 12 a child abuse assessment within twenty-four hours of receiving 13 the report or a family assessment within seventy-two hours of 14 receiving the report. During a child abuse assessment, if the 15 department identifies known risk factors for commercial sexual 16 exploitation, a screening shall be conducted by a trained child 17 protection worker, considering the childâs age, cognitive and 18 emotional functioning, and the specific circumstances of the 19 case. 20 Sec. 79. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 1036, section 11, if 21 enacted, is amended to read as follows: 22 SEC. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes effect July 23 1, 2026 2027 : 24 The section of this Act amending section 910.1. 25 Sec. 80. REPEAL. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 1036, sections 26 1 and 4, if enacted, are repealed. 27 Sec. 81. REPORT. Notwithstanding 2026 Iowa Acts, House 28 File 1036, section 10, if enacted, the report described in that 29 section is due by December 15, 2026. 30 Sec. 82. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this 31 Act takes effect July 1, 2026, if 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 32 1036, is enacted. 33 DIVISION XVI 34 FEDERAL GRANTS AND LOANS ââ NOTIFICATION 35 -28- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 28/ 41 S.F. _____ Sec. 83. Section 8.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. Once per month, the office of grants 3 enterprise management shall notify by electronic mail the 4 chairpersons and ranking members of the standing committees on 5 appropriations of the senate and house of representatives, the 6 chairperson and ranking member of the house of representatives 7 appropriations subcommittee on federal and other funds, and the 8 legislative services agency of all of the following: 9 (1) Each federal grant or loan of five million dollars 10 or more that a department or establishment has applied for 11 or received in the prior month. This subparagraph does not 12 apply to the department of public defense or the state board 13 of regents or its institutions. 14 (2) Each federal grant or loan requiring state matching 15 moneys that a department or establishment has applied for or 16 received in the prior month. 17 b. This subsection does not apply to block grants described 18 in section 8.41. 19 Sec. 84. NEW SECTION . 602.1306 Federal grants and loans ââ 20 notification of general assembly. 21 Within thirty days of applying for or receiving a federal 22 grant or loan of five million dollars or more, or a federal 23 grant or loan requiring state matching moneys, the judicial 24 branch shall notify by electronic mail the chairpersons and 25 ranking members of the standing committees on appropriations of 26 the senate and house of representatives, the chairperson and 27 ranking member of the house of representatives appropriations 28 subcommittee on federal and other funds, and the legislative 29 services agency. 30 DIVISION XVII 31 AREA EDUCATION AGENCIES ââ QUARTERLY PAYMENTS ââ FY 2026-2027 32 Sec. 85. Section 257.35, subsection 1, paragraph a, 33 subparagraph (3), unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, as amended 34 by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2201, section 17, is amended to 35 -29- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 29/ 41 S.F. _____ read as follows: 1 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and the fiscal 2 year beginning July 1, 2026, the department of management shall 3 deduct the following from the state aid due to each school 4 district pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the amounts to 5 the respective area education agencies on a monthly basis from 6 September 15 through June 15 during each school year: 7 Sec. 86. Section 257.35, subsection 1, paragraph a, 8 subparagraph (4), unnumbered paragraph 1, as enacted by 2026 9 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2201, section 18, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027 2026 , and each 12 fiscal year thereafter, the department of management shall 13 deduct the following from the state aid due to each school 14 district pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the amounts to 15 the respective area education agencies on a quarterly basis 16 from July 15 to April 15 during each school year: 17 Sec. 87. Section 257.35, subsection 21, unnumbered 18 paragraph 1, Code 2026, as amended by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate 19 File 2201, section 19, is amended to read as follows: 20 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and the fiscal 21 year beginning July 1, 2026, the director of the department of 22 management may deduct the following from the state aid due to 23 each school district pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the 24 amounts to the respective area education agencies on a monthly 25 basis from September 15 through June 15 during each school year 26 for purposes of providing services to students enrolled in 27 nonpublic schools within the boundaries of the area education 28 agency: 29 Sec. 88. Section 257.35, subsection 21A, unnumbered 30 paragraph 1, as enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, Senate File 2201, 31 section 20, is amended to read as follows: 32 For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027 2026 , and each 33 fiscal year thereafter, the director of the department of 34 management may deduct the following from the state aid due 35 -30- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 30/ 41 S.F. _____ to each school district pursuant to this chapter and shall 1 pay the amounts to the respective area education agencies on 2 a quarterly basis from July 15 through April 15 during each 3 school year for the purposes of providing services to students 4 enrolled in nonpublic schools within the boundaries of the area 5 education agency: 6 DIVISION XVIII 7 HIGHER EDUCATION ââ CIVIC PROFICIENCY 8 Sec. 89. NEW SECTION . 262.100 General education 9 requirements and core curricula ââ courses on American history 10 and American government. 11 1. The state board of regents shall require each institution 12 of higher education governed by the board to establish as 13 a requirement for the completion of any general education 14 requirements or core curricula that an undergraduate student 15 complete an introductory survey course in American history 16 and an introductory survey course in American government. An 17 institution shall assign a value of at least three semester 18 hours of credit to each course. A course required by this 19 section shall be a comprehensive survey of all American history 20 and American government. 21 2. A course required by this section shall fulfill the 22 general education or core curriculum requirement for social 23 sciences or humanities, as designated by the institution, that 24 a student is required to complete as a condition of graduation. 25 3. An institution shall provide equivalent credit toward 26 the courses required by this section to a student transferring 27 to the institution for previous coursework completed by the 28 student that is substantially similar to a required course. 29 4. This section does not apply to a student completing a 30 degree program designated by an institution as a degree program 31 of three years or less in duration. 32 5. a. Annually, the center for cyclone civics at the Iowa 33 state university of science and technology and the center 34 for civic education at the university of northern Iowa shall 35 -31- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 31/ 41 S.F. _____ designate courses at their respective institutions that satisfy 1 the requirements of this section. 2 b. The center for intellectual freedom at the state 3 university of Iowa shall be the sole academic unit at the 4 state university of Iowa responsible for offering courses that 5 satisfy the requirements of this section. 6 Sec. 90. APPLICABILITY. This division of this Act applies 7 to undergraduate students beginning enrollment at institutions 8 of higher education governed by the board of regents in 9 academic years beginning on or after July 1, 2028. 10 DIVISION XIX 11 CHARTER SCHOOLS ââ IPERS 12 Sec. 91. Section 97B.1A, subsection 8, paragraph a, 13 subparagraph (13), if enacted by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 14 2754, section 69, is amended to read as follows: 15 (13) Persons employed by a charter school established 16 pursuant to chapter 256E , subchapter I, that satisfies all 17 applicable requirements under federal law for participation in 18 the retirement system. 19 Sec. 92. Section 97B.1A, subsection 9, paragraph a, Code 20 2026, as amended by 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2754, section 21 70, if enacted, is amended to read as follows: 22 a. âEmployerâ means the state of Iowa, the counties, 23 municipalities, agencies, public school districts, charter 24 schools established pursuant to chapter 256E , subchapter 25 I, that satisfy all applicable requirements under federal 26 law for participation in the retirement system, all 27 political subdivisions, and all of their departments and 28 instrumentalities, including area agencies on aging, other than 29 those employing persons as specified in subsection 8 , paragraph 30 âbâ , subparagraph (7), and joint planning commissions created 31 under chapter 28E or 28I . 32 Sec. 93. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 33 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 34 Sec. 94. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 35 -32- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 32/ 41 S.F. _____ Act applies retroactively to the effective date of 2026 Iowa 1 Acts, House File 2754, if enacted. 2 DIVISION XX 3 INCENTIVES ââ SCHOOL DISTRICTS 4 Sec. 95. Section 257.3, subsection 2, paragraph d, Code 5 2026, is amended to read as follows: 6 d. For purposes of this section , a reorganized school 7 district is one which absorbs at least thirty percent of the 8 enrollment of the school district affected by a reorganization 9 or dissolved during a dissolution and in which action to bring 10 about a reorganization or dissolution is initiated by a vote 11 of the board of directors or jointly by the affected boards of 12 directors to take effect on or after July 1, 2007, and on or 13 before July 1, 2024 2035 . Each district which initiated, by 14 a vote of the board of directors or jointly by the affected 15 boards, action to bring about a reorganization or dissolution 16 to take effect on or after July 1, 2007, and on or before July 17 1, 2024 2035 , shall certify the date and the nature of the 18 action taken to the department of education by January 1 of the 19 year in which the reorganization or dissolution takes effect. 20 Sec. 96. Section 257.11, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 21 2026, is amended to read as follows: 22 c. Pupils attending class for all or a substantial portion 23 of a school day pursuant to a whole grade sharing agreement 24 executed under sections 282.10 through 282.12 shall be eligible 25 for supplementary weighting pursuant to this subsection . A 26 school district which executes a whole grade sharing agreement 27 and which adopts a resolution jointly with other affected 28 boards to study the question of undergoing a reorganization 29 or dissolution to take effect on or before July 1, 2024 2035 , 30 shall receive a weighting of one-tenth of the percentage of 31 the pupilâs school day during which the pupil attends classes 32 in another district, attends classes taught by a teacher who 33 is jointly employed under section 280.15 , or attends classes 34 taught by a teacher who is employed by another school district. 35 -33- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 33/ 41 S.F. _____ A district shall be eligible for supplementary weighting 1 pursuant to this paragraph for a maximum of three years. 2 Receipt of supplementary weighting for a second and third year 3 shall be conditioned upon submission of information resulting 4 from the study to the school budget review committee indicating 5 progress toward the objective of reorganization on or before 6 July 1, 2024 2035 . 7 Sec. 97. Section 257.11A, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, 8 are amended to read as follows: 9 1. In determining weighted enrollment under section 257.6 , 10 if the board of directors of a school district has approved a 11 contract for sharing pursuant to section 257.11 and the school 12 district has approved an action to bring about a reorganization 13 to take effect on and after July 1, 2007, and on or before July 14 1, 2024 2035 , the reorganized school district shall include, 15 for a period of three years following the effective date of 16 the reorganization, additional pupils added by the application 17 of the supplementary weighting plan, equal to the pupils added 18 by the application of the supplementary weighting plan in the 19 year preceding the reorganization. For the purposes of this 20 subsection , the weighted enrollment for the period of three 21 years following the effective date of reorganization shall 22 include the supplementary weighting in the base year used for 23 determining the combined district cost for the first year of 24 the reorganization. However, the weighting shall be reduced by 25 the supplementary weighting added for a pupil whose residency 26 is not within the reorganized district. 27 2. For purposes of this section , a reorganized district is 28 one in which the reorganization was approved in an election 29 pursuant to sections 275.18 and 275.20 and takes effect on or 30 after July 1, 2007, and on or before July 1, 2024 2035 . Each 31 district which initiates, by a vote of the board of directors 32 or jointly by the affected boards, action to bring about a 33 reorganization or dissolution to take effect on or after July 34 1, 2007, and on or before July 1, 2024 2035 , shall certify the 35 -34- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 34/ 41 S.F. _____ date and the nature of the action taken to the department of 1 education by January 1 of the year in which the reorganization 2 or dissolution takes effect. 3 DIVISION XXI 4 EXTRACURRICULAR INTERSCHOLASTIC ELIGIBILITY 5 Sec. 98. 2026 Iowa Acts, House File 2591, sections 4, 5, and 6 6, if enacted, are amended to read as follows: 7 SEC. 4. EMERGENCY RULES. The state board of education shall 8 adopt emergency rules under section 17A.4, subsection 3, and 9 section 17A.5, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, to implement the 10 section of this Act amending section 256.7. The rules shall 11 be effective no later than August 1, 2026. Any rules adopted 12 in accordance with this section shall also be published as a 13 notice of intended action as provided in section 17A.4. 14 SEC. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following take effect August 15 1, 2026: 16 1. The section of this Act amending section 256.7. 17 1. 2. The section of this Act amending section 256.46. 18 2. 3. The section of this Act amending section 282.18. 19 SEC. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 20 immediate importance, take takes effect upon enactment: 21 1. The section of this Act amending section 256.7. 22 2. The section of this Act requiring emergency rulemaking. 23 Sec. 99. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 24 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25 Sec. 100. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This division of this 26 Act applies retroactively to the enactment date of 2026 Iowa 27 Acts, House File 2591, if enacted. 28 DIVISION XXII 29 LEVY INCREASE 30 Sec. 101. SCHOOL DISTRICT CASH RESERVE LEVY INCREASE ââ 31 SCHOOL BUDGET YEAR 2026-2027. 32 1. For the school budget year beginning July 1, 2026, a 33 school district for which the taxable value used to calculate 34 school district property taxes for the school budget year 35 -35- LSB 6957XC (22) 91 ns/jh 35/ 41 S.F. _____ beginning July 1, 2025, was reduced by one hundred million 1 dollars or more due to a correction to the taxable value of 2 a single property within the school district made during the 3 school budget year beginning July 1, 2025, may increase the 4 school districtâs proposed cash reserve levy under section 5 298.10 to an amount that exceeds the limitations of section 6 298.10, if the district complies with subsection 2. 7 2. A school district that increases its cash reserve levy 8 pursuant to this section shall also reduce one or more other 9 property tax levies of the school district, including the 10 district management levy under section 298.4, by a total amount 11 equal to or greater than the increase in the cash reserve 12 levy so that the total property tax dollars for all property 13 tax levies of the school district does not exceed the school 14 districtâs combined amount of property tax dollars determined 15 under section 24.2A, subsection 2, paragraph âbâ, subparagraph 16 (3). 17 3. A school district that wishes to adjust its levy rates 18 pursuant to this section shall notify the department of 19 management in a manner prescribed by the department. Following 20 receipt of the notice from the school district, the department 21 of management shall adjust the school districtâs property tax 22 levy rates as necessary to implement this section. 23 Sec. 102. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 24 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25